Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.010

Official bond.

The secretary of state must execute an official bond to the state in the sum of ten thousand dollars, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office, and shall receive no pay until such bond, approved by the governor, is filed with the state auditor.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5024; 1965 c 8 s 43.07.010. Prior: 1890 p 633 s 10; RRS s 10994.]